ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > キッチン家電関連用品 > バーベキューグリル関連用品 > バーベキューグリル用交換部品: グリルバーナー; グリルコントロールノブ; グリルドリップパン; グリル焼き網; グリルヒートプレート・ヒートシールド; グリルホース・レギュレーター; グリル点火装置; グリル温度計
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Аксессуары для кухонной техники > Аксессуары для уличных грилей > Запасные детали для уличных грилей: Горелки для грилей; Ручки управления грилем; Поддоны для сбора жира с гриля; Решетки для грилей; Тепловые пластины и теплозащитные экраны для гриля; Шланги и регуляторы для гриля; Системы поджига для грилей; Термометры для грилей
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Αξεσουάρ οικιακών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ εξωτερικών ψησταριών > Ανταλλακτικά εξωτερικών ψησταριών: Καυστήρες ψησταριάς; Κουμπιά ελέγχου ψησταριάς; Δίσκοι συλλογής λιπών ψησταριάς; Σχάρες ψησταριάς; Πλάκες θερμότητας & θερμοασπίδες ψησταριάς; Σωλήνες & ρυθμιστές ψησταριάς; Αναπτήρες ψησταριάς; Θερμόμετρα ψησταριάς
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Dodatki za kuhinjske aparate > Dodatki za zunanje žare > Nadomestni deli za zunanje žare: Gorilniki za žar; Gumbi za upravljanje žara; Posode za odcejanje za žar; Rešetke za žar; Grelne plošče in toplotni ščiti za žar; Cevi in regulatorji za žar; Vžigalniki za žar; Termometri za žar
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Kuchyňské spotřebiče – příslušenství > Venkovní grily – příslušenství > Náhradní součásti k venkovním grilům: Hořáky grilu; Ovládací knoflíky grilu; Odkapávací pánve na gril; Grilovací rošty; Topné desky a tepelné štíty grilu; Hadice a regulátory grilu; Podpalovače grilů; Teploměry pro grily
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > อุปกรณ์เครื่องใช้ในครัว > อุปกรณ์ปิ้งย่างกลางแจ้ง > ชิ้นส่วนอะไหล่เตาปิ้งย่างกลางแจ้ง: เตาปิ้งย่าง; ปุ่มควบคุมการย่าง; ถาดรองน้ำมันย่าง; ตะแกรงย่าง; แผ่นกระจายความร้อนและแผ่นกันความร้อนสำหรับเตาปิ้งย่าง; สายแก๊สและตัวควบคุมแรงดันสำหรับเตาย่าง; หัวเทียนจุดเตา; เครื่องวัดอุณหภูมิเตาย่าง
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Accessori strumenti cucina > Accessori grigliata esterni > Parti di ricambio per griglie da esterno: Bruciatori per griglia; Manopole di controllo della griglia; Leccarde per griglia; Griglie per griglia; Piastre riscaldanti e scudi termici per grigliate; Tubi e regolatori per griglia; Accenditori per griglia; Termometri per griglia
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 厨房电器配件 > 户外烤炉配件 > 户外烧烤更换部件: 烧烤炉; 烤炉控制旋钮; 烤炉滴油盘; 烤架; 烤炉加热板/隔热罩; 烤炉软管/调压阀; 烧烤点火器; 烧烤温度计
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Pribor za kuhinjske aparate > Pribor za vanjski roštilj > Zamjenski dijelovi za vanjski roštilj: Plamenici za roštilj; Gumbi za upravljanje roštiljem; Posude za sakupljanje masnoće s roštilja; Gradele za roštilj; Grijaće ploče i zaštite od topline za roštilje; Crijeva i regulatori za roštilje; Zapaljivači roštilja; Termometri za roštilj
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Tilbehør til kjøkkenapparater > Tilbehør til utendørsgriller > Erstatningsdeler for utegriller: Grillbrennere; Grillkontrollknapper; Grilldrypppanner; Grillrister; Grillvarmeplater og varmeskjold; Grillslanger og regulatorer; Grilltennere; Grilltermometre
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Konyhaigép-kiegészítők > Kültérigrill-kiegészítők > Kültérigrill-cserealkatrészek: Grill-égők; Grillvezérlő gombok; Grill csepegtetőtálcák; Grillrácsok; Grill fűtőlapok és hővédők; Grill tömlők és szabályozók; Grillgyújtók; Grill-hőmérők
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Príslušenstvo pre kuchynské spotrebiče > Príslušenstvo pre externé grily > Náhradné diely pre externý gril: Horáky na grilovanie; Ovládacie gombíky grilu; Odkvapkávacie misky na gril; Grilovacie rošty; Tepelné dosky a štíty ku grilu; Hadice a ovládače grilu; Zapaľovače pre grily; Teplomery pre grily
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Accessoires petit électroménager > Accessoires de gril d’extérieur > Pièces de rechange pour grils d’extérieur: Brûleurs de gril; Boutons de commande pour barbecue; Lèchefrites; Grilles de gril; Plaques chauffantes et boucliers thermiques pour barbecues; Tuyaux et régulateurs pour barbecue; Allumeurs de gril; Thermomètres de gril
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Akcesoria do sprzętów kuchennych > Akcesoria do grilla na zewnątrz > Części zamienne do grilli ogrodowych: Palniki do grilla; Pokrętła do grilli; Tacki ociekowe do grilla; Ruszty do grilla; Osłony termiczne i płyty grzewcze do grilli; Węże i regulatory do grilla; Zapalniki do grilla; Termometry do grilla
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Keittiölaitteiden lisätarvikkeet > Ulkokäyttöisten grillien lisätarvikkeet > Ulkogrillien varaosat: Grillipolttimet; Grillin säätönupit; Grillin tippa-astiat; Grilliritilät; Grillin lämpölevyt ja lämpösuojat; Grillin letkut ja paineensäätimet; Grillin sytyttimet; Grillin lämpömittarit
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Acessórios para eletrodomésticos de cozinha > Acessórios para churrasqueira externa > Peças de reposição para churrasqueira externa: Queimadores para churrasqueira; Botões de controle para grelha; Bandejas coletoras para grelha; Grelhas para churrasqueira; Placas escudos térmicos para grelha; Mangueiras e reguladores para grelha; Acendedores para churrasqueira; Termômetros para churrasqueira
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Accesorios para aparatos de cocina > Accesorios para barbacoas > Piezas de repuesto para barbacoas exteriores: Quemadores de barbacoas; Perillas de control de la parrilla; Bandejas de goteo para parrilla; Parrillas para barbacoas; Placas y protectores térmicos para parrillas; Mangueras y reguladores para parrilla; Encendedores para barbacoas; Termómetros para barbacoas
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Kitchen Appliance Accessories > Outdoor Grill Accessories > Outdoor Grill Replacement Parts: Grill Burners; Grill Control Knobs; Grill Drip Pans; Grill Grates; Grill Heat Plates & Heat Shields; Grill Hoses & Regulators; Grill Igniters; Grill Thermometers
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Virtuvės prietaisų priedai > Lauko kepsninių priedai > Lauko kepsninių atsarginės dalys: Kepsninių degikliai; Keptuvo valdymo rankenėlės; Keptuvo lašų surinkimo indai; Kepsninių grotelės; Keptuvo kaitinimo plokštės ir apsaugos nuo karščio; Keptuvo žarnos ir reguliatoriai; Kepsninių degikliai; Kepsninių termometrai
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 주방가전 부대용품 > 야외용 그릴 부대용품 > 야외용 그릴 교체 부품: 그릴 버너; 그릴 조절 손잡이; 그릴 기름받이 팬; 그릴 불판; 그릴 열판 및 열 차단판; 그릴 호스 및 레귤레이터; 그릴 점화기; 그릴 온도계
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Accessoires voor keukenmachines > Accessoires voor barbecues > Vervangingsonderdelen voor barbecues: Branders voor barbecues; Grillbedieningsknoppen; Grillopvangbakken; Roosters voor barbecues; Warmteplaten en hitteschilden voor grills; Gasslangen en drukregelaars voor grills; Ontstekers voor barbecues; Thermometers voor barbecues
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Аксесоари за кухненски уреди > Аксесоари за грил на открито > Резервни части за грил на открито: Горелки за газови грилове; Копчета за управление на грила; Тави за отцеждане на скара; Решетки за скара; Термоплочи и топлинни щитове за скара; Маркучи и регулатори за скара; Комплекти за запалване на грил; Термометри за грил
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 廚房電器配件 > 戶外烤肉器具 > 室外烤肉爐替換零件: 烤肉火爐; 烤肉架控制旋鈕; 烤肉架滴油盤; 烤架; 烤肉架均熱板與隔熱板; 烤肉架軟管與調節器; 烤肉爐點火器; 烤肉爐溫度計
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Zubehör für Küchengeräte > Außengrillzubehör > Ersatzteile für Außengrills: Grillbrenner; Grillreglerknöpfe; Grill-Auffangschalen; Grillroste; Grill-Hitzeschutzplatten und -Hitzeschilde; Grillschläuche und -regler; Grillanzünder; Grillthermometer
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Accesorii pentru electrocasnice de bucătărie > Accesorii pentru grătar în aer liber > Piese de schimb pentru grătar în aer liber: Arzătoare pentru grătar; Butoane de control pentru grătar; Tigăi de scurgere pentru grătar; Grătare pentru grătar; Plăci de încălzire și scuturi termice pentru grătar; Furtunuri și regulatoare pentru grătar; Aprinzătoare pentru grătar; Termometre pentru grătar
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Mutfak Aleti Aksesuarları > Bahçe Izgarası Aksesuarları > Bahçe Izgarası Yedek Parçaları: Izgara Brülörleri; Izgara Kontrol Düğmeleri; Izgara Damlama Tepsileri; Izgara Bölmeleri; Izgara Isı Plakaları ve Isı Kalkanları; Izgara Hortumları ve Regülatörleri; Izgara Ateşleyicileri; Izgara Termometreleri
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Acessórios de aparelhos domésticos > Acessórios para grelhador de exterior > Peças de substituição para grelhador de exterior: Queimadores para grelhador; Botões de controlo para grelhador; Tabuleiros coletores de gordura para grelhador; Grelhas para grelhador; Placas de aquecimento e protetores térmicos para grelhador; Mangueiras e reguladores para grelhadores; Acendedores para grelhador; Termómetros para grelhador
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Køkkenapparater – tilbehør > Udendørsgrill – tilbehør > Reservedele til udendørs grill: Grillbrændere; Grillkontrolknapper; Grilldrypbakker; Grillriste; Grillvarmeplader og -varmeskjolde; Grillslanger og -regulatorer; Grilltændere; Grilltermometre
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Tillbehör till köksapparater > Tillbehör till utomhusgrillar > Reservdelar till utomhusgrill: Grillbrännare; Grillvred; Grilldropplåtar; Grillgaller; Grillvärmeplattor och -värmesköldar; Grillslangar och -regulatorer; Grilltändare; Grilltermometrar
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Phụ kiện đồ dùng nhà bếp > Phụ kiện nướng ngoài trời > Phụ kiện lò nướng ngoài trời: Đầu đốt nướng; Núm điều khiển bếp nướng; Khay hứng mỡ bếp nướng; Vỉ nướng; Tấm tản nhiệt và tấm chắn nhiệt cho bếp nướng; Ống dẫn và van điều áp bếp nướng; Bộ đánh lửa lò nướng; Nhiệt kế vỉ nướng